Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2319
Herd certification program authorized.

In addition to administering the Domesticated Cervine Animal Act and conducting program activities authorized by the act, the department may develop a herd certification program and may cooperate with the United States Government, or any department, agency, or officer thereof, in the development of such program, including the adoption of or reference to applicable federal regulations or industry guidelines.

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 18.